lib/tex/inputs/hyphen-nederlands.tex
% hyphen.tex for dutch
%
% Installation:
%
% Replace the file HYPHEN.TEX by the one given below.
% Run initex on the preferred format (e.g. PLAIN.TEX or LPLAIN.TEX).
% Rename the output .FMT file : e.g. PLAIN.FMT ---> PLAIN_NEDERLANDS.FMT
% Replace the original HYPHEN.TEX.
% Define the commands nTeX   as ``TeX &plain_nederlands'',
%                    nLaTeX as ``TeX &lplain_nederlands''.
%
%                                                   Peter Vanroose
%                                                   Department of Mathematics,
%                                                   K.U. Leuven, Belgium.
%                                                   VANROOSE@kulmath.uucp
%
% ========================HYPHEN_NEDERLANDS.TEX================================
\patterns{
a1o % consecutive vowels, no diphthong
e1a
e1o
i1a
i5i
i1o
o1a
u1a
u1e
a4a % double vowels or diphthong
a4i
a4u
e4e
e4i
e4u
i4e
o4e
o4o
o4o4i
o4u
u4i
u4u
c6h % never split between ch, ij and sch
i6j
s6ch2
6sch.
k2n % no splitting between kn, sm, sn, sp, st, str, spr, spl and th
s2m
s2n
s2p
s2t
s2t2r
s2p2r
s2p2l
t4h
2x     % no splitting before an x
.ve2r1 % some special cases
1pje.
te1ge2n1
.ach1te2r1
k2wart
k2wadr
s2fe
a4s1t % no splitting before st if preceeded by a vowel.
e4s1t
i4s1t
o4s1t
u4s1t
y4s1t
j4s1t
1ba % split before the last consonant preceeding a vowel,
1be % where vowel is:  a, e, i, o, u, y, and consonant:
1bi % b,c,d,f,g,h,j,k,l,m,n,p,q,r,s,t,v,w,z, ch, sch, st, str, spr, spl,
1bo % br,cr,dr,fr,gr,kr,pr,tr,vr,wr,chr,schr, bl,cl,fl,gl,kl,pl,sl,vl,chl
1bu
1by
1ca
1ce
1ci
1co
1cu
1cy
1cha
1che
1chi
1cho
1chu
1chy
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1dy
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1fy
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1gy
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1hy
1ja
1je
1ji
1jo
1ju
1jy
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1ky
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1ly
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1my
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1ny
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1py
1qa
1qe
1qi
1qo
 q6u
1qy
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1ry
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1sy
1scha
1sche
1schi
1scho
1schu
1schy
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1ty
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1vy
1wa
1we
1wi
1wo
1wu
1wy
1za
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zy
1b2la
1b2le
1b2li
1b2lo
1b2lu
1b2ly
1c2la
1c2le
1c2li
1c2lo
1c2lu
1c2ly
1ch2la
1ch2le
1ch2li
1ch2lo
1ch2lu
1ch2ly
1f2la
1f2le
1f2li
1f2lo
1f2lu
1f2ly
1g2la
1g2le
1g2li
1g2lo
1g2lu
1g2ly
1k2la
1k2le
1k2li
1k2lo
1k2lu
1k2ly
1p2la
1p2le
1p2li
1p2lo
1p2lu
1p2ly
1s2la
1s2le
1s2li
1s2lo
1s2lu
1s2ly
1s2p2la
1s2p2le
1s2p2li
1s2p2lo
1s2p2lu
1s2p2ly
1v2la
1v2le
1v2li
1v2lo
1v2lu
1v2ly
1b2ra
1b2re
1b2ri
1b2ro
1b2ru
1b2ry
1c2ra
1c2re
1c2ri
1c2ro
1c2ru
1c2ry
1ch2ra
1ch2re
1ch2ri
1ch2ro
1ch2ru
1ch2ry
1d2ra
1d2re
1d2ri
1d2ro
1d2ru
1d2ry
1f2ra
1f2re
1f2ri
1f2ro
1f2ru
1f2ry
1g2ra
1g2re
1g2ri
1g2ro
1g2ru
1g2ry
1k2ra
1k2re
1k2ri
1k2ro
1k2ru
1k2ry
1p2ra
1p2re
1p2ri
1p2ro
1p2ru
1p2ry
1sch2ra
1sch2re
1sch2ri
1sch2ro
1sch2ru
1sch2ry
1s2ta
1s2te
1s2ti
1s2to
1s2tu
1s2ty
1s2p2ra
1s2p2re
1s2p2ri
1s2p2ro
1s2p2ru
1s2p2ry
1s2t2ra
1s2t2re
1s2t2ri
1s2t2ro
1s2t2ru
1s2t2ry
1t2ra
1t2re
1t2ri
1t2ro
1t2ru
1t2ry
1v2ra
1v2re
1v2ri
1v2ro
1v2ru
1v2ry
1w2ra
1w2re
1w2ri
1w2ro
1w2ru
1w2ry
}
\hyphenation{ % some words frequently encountered in mathematics texts.
nog-al
rang-orde
volg-orde
wan-orde
wan-or-de-lijk
}
